Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,116
Vehicle owner; driver violations.

The owner of any vehicle or any person employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle shall not require or knowingly permit the operation of such vehicle in any manner contrary to the Nebraska Rules of the Road.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 116;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,116;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 212.